Louisiana, session 2026, HB727.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 30:2155.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §2155.2. Construction debris
8 A. The department shall not prohibit the burning of untreated, unpainted
9 dimensional lumber or wood mats.
10 B. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with
11 the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.